Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1539.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 686.040 is amended to read:
686.040. (1) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to the following:
(a) Commissioned veterinary officers of the United States Army, or those in the employ of other
United States Government agencies while engaged in their official capacity, unless they enter into
a private practice.
(b) An individual who has received training to verify whether cattle are pregnant and is
performing pregnancy verification services on cattle within the scope of the individual’s
training.
(2) Nothing in ORS 167.322 or 686.020 (1)(a) shall be so construed as to prevent any person or
the agent or employee of the person from practicing veterinary medicine and surgery or dentistry
in a humane manner on any animal belonging to the person, agent or employee or for gratuitous
services or from dehorning and vaccinating cattle for the person, agent or employee.
(3) Nothing in ORS 686.020 (1)(a) shall be so construed as to prevent the selling of veterinary
remedies and instruments by a licensed pharmacist at the regular place of business of the licensed
pharmacist.
(4) A practitioner of allied health methods may practice that method on animals without vio-
lating ORS 686.020 (1)(a), as long as the practice is in conformance with laws and rules governing
the practitioner’s practice and the practice is upon referral from a licensed veterinarian for treat-
ment or therapy specified by the veterinarian.
(5) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to the lay testing of poultry by the whole blood
agglutination test.
(6) A certified euthanasia technician holding an active, current certificate may inject sodium
pentobarbital, sedative and analgesic medications and any other euthanasia substance approved by
the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board without violating ORS 686.020 (1)(a).
(7) The board by rule may specify circumstances under which unlicensed persons may give
vaccinations, administer an anesthetic or otherwise assist in the practice of veterinary medicine.
(8) Any individual licensed as a veterinarian in another state may be used in consultation in this
state with a person licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state provided the consultation
does not exceed 30 days in any 365 consecutive days.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1539 (SB 1539-A) Page 1

(9) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to authorized representatives of the State Department of
Agriculture in the discharge of any duty authorized by the department.
(10) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to an unlicensed representative of a livestock association,
cow-testing association, or poultry association who, for the benefit of the association, takes blood
samples for laboratory tests for the diagnosis of livestock or poultry diseases, but only if this person
has received authorization from the State Department of Agriculture following a written request to
the department.
(11) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to persons permitted by the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife to rehabilitate orphaned, sick or injured wildlife, as defined in ORS 496.004, for the purpose
of restoring the animals to the wild.
(12) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to students, agents or employees of public or private ed-
ucational or medical research institutions involved in educational or research activities under the
auspices of those institutions.
(13) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to:
(a) Veterinarians employed by Oregon State University;
(b) Instructors of veterinary courses; or
(c) Students of veterinary science who participate in the diagnosis and treatment of animals if
the students:
(A) Are participating in the diagnosis and treatment of animals while engaged in an educational
program approved by the board or a college of veterinary medicine accredited by the American
Veterinary Medical Association; and
(B) Are under the direct supervision of an Oregon licensed veterinarian or a veterinarian ap-
proved by the board or Oregon State University to supervise students in the educational program.
(14) The Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board may by rule specify circum-
stances under which unlicensed persons may engage in activities described in subsection
(1)(b) of this section.
SECTION 2. ORS 686.040, as amended by section 1 of this 2026 Act, is amended to read:
686.040. (1) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to [the following:]
[(a)] commissioned veterinary officers of the United States Army, or those in the employ of other
United States Government agencies while engaged in their official capacity, unless they enter into
a private practice.
[(b) An individual who has received training to verify whether cattle are pregnant and is per-
forming pregnancy verification services on cattle within the scope of the individual’s training.]
(2) Nothing in ORS 167.322 or 686.020 (1)(a) shall be so construed as to prevent any person or
the agent or employee of the person from practicing veterinary medicine and surgery or dentistry
in a humane manner on any animal belonging to the person, agent or employee or for gratuitous
services or from dehorning and vaccinating cattle for the person, agent or employee.
(3) Nothing in ORS 686.020 (1)(a) shall be so construed as to prevent the selling of veterinary
remedies and instruments by a licensed pharmacist at the regular place of business of the licensed
pharmacist.
(4) A practitioner of allied health methods may practice that method on animals without vio-
lating ORS 686.020 (1)(a), as long as the practice is in conformance with laws and rules governing
the practitioner’s practice and the practice is upon referral from a licensed veterinarian for treat-
ment or therapy specified by the veterinarian.
(5) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to the lay testing of poultry by the whole blood
agglutination test.
(6) A certified euthanasia technician holding an active, current certificate may inject sodium
pentobarbital, sedative and analgesic medications and any other euthanasia substance approved by
the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board without violating ORS 686.020 (1)(a).
(7) The board by rule may specify circumstances under which unlicensed persons may give
vaccinations, administer an anesthetic or otherwise assist in the practice of veterinary medicine.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1539 (SB 1539-A) Page 2

(8) Any individual licensed as a veterinarian in another state may be used in consultation in this
state with a person licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state provided the consultation
does not exceed 30 days in any 365 consecutive days.
(9) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to authorized representatives of the State Department of
Agriculture in the discharge of any duty authorized by the department.
(10) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to an unlicensed representative of a livestock association,
cow-testing association, or poultry association who, for the benefit of the association, takes blood
samples for laboratory tests for the diagnosis of livestock or poultry diseases, but only if this person
has received authorization from the State Department of Agriculture following a written request to
the department.
(11) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to persons permitted by the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife to rehabilitate orphaned, sick or injured wildlife, as defined in ORS 496.004, for the purpose
of restoring the animals to the wild.
(12) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to students, agents or employees of public or private ed-
ucational or medical research institutions involved in educational or research activities under the
auspices of those institutions.
(13) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to:
(a) Veterinarians employed by Oregon State University;
(b) Instructors of veterinary courses; or
(c) Students of veterinary science who participate in the diagnosis and treatment of animals if
the students:
(A) Are participating in the diagnosis and treatment of animals while engaged in an educational
program approved by the board or a college of veterinary medicine accredited by the American
Veterinary Medical Association; and
(B) Are under the direct supervision of an Oregon licensed veterinarian or a veterinarian ap-
proved by the board or Oregon State University to supervise students in the educational program.
[(14) The Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board may by rule specify circumstances
under which unlicensed persons may engage in activities described in subsection (1)(b) of this
section.]
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 686.040 by section 2 of this 2026 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2031.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1539 (SB 1539-A) Page 3

Passed by Senate February 19, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by House February 27, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1539 (SB 1539-A) Page 4